Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5849.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. (1) A person that operates a data center shall ensure that the data center has security measures in place to protect against all of the following: (a) Cyberattacks on the data center. (b) Physical or cyber disruptions to the data center. (2) A person that operates a data center shall implement a risk-based cybersecurity and resilience program to achieve the security measures described in subsection (1). The risk-based cybersecurity and resilience program must be aligned with nationally recognized cybersecurity frameworks and guidance including the NIST cybersecurity framework and guidance issued by the cybersecurity and infrastructure security agency, without requiring compliance with any single framework or technology. (3) Based on the size, function, and risk profile of the data center, a person that operates a data center shall use all of the following systems, as applicable: (a) Safety-critical systems that are capable of defaulting to a safe state. (b) Redundant cooling and thermal controls. (c) On-site manual override access. (d) Segmentation of safety systems from public-facing networks. (4) A person that operates a data center shall create and maintain the following plans: (a) An incident response plan that contains, but is not limited to, all of the following information: (i) Identification of responsible personnel, communication procedures, and notification procedures. (ii) System restoration priorities. (iii) Coordination with emergency responders and utilities. (b) A disaster recovery plan that contains, but is not limited to, all of the following: (i) System and data restoration priorities. (ii) Backup, redundancy, or continuity strategies appropriate to the facility. (iii) Periodic testing, review, and updating of the plan. (5) A person that violates this section is subject to a civil fine of not more than $25,000.00 for each day that the person is in violation of this section. The prosecutor of the county in which the violation occurred or the attorney general may bring an action to collect the fine. (6) As used in this section: (a) "Critical infrastructure" means systems and assets necessary for the safe and reliable operation of a data center, including power supply, cooling, fire suppression, and network management systems. (b) "Data center" means a qualified data center as that term is defined in section 4ee of the general sales tax act, 1933 PA 167, MCL 205.54ee, or section 4cc of the use tax act, 1937 PA 94, MCL 205.94cc.